Wyoming, session 2025, SF0029.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 1-3-120 is created to read:

1-3-120. Firearm hold agreements; limitation of
liability; definition.

SF0029

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0082
(a) No cause of action shall arise against a person
for returning a firearm to a firearm owner at the
termination of a firearm hold agreement.

(b) The immunity provided in subsection (a) of this
section shall not apply to an action arising against a
person for returning a firearm to a firearm owner at the
termination of a firearm hold agreement if the action was
the result of a breach of contract or otherwise unlawful
conduct on the part of the person holding a firearm for
another person.

(c) As used in this section, "firearm hold agreement"
means a written or oral agreement between a firearm owner
and another person in which the other person takes physical
possession of the firearm owner's lawfully possessed
firearm at the owner's request, holds the firearm for an
agreed period of time and returns the firearm to the owner
according to the terms of the agreement.

(d) This section shall not apply to firearms,
machineguns, rifles, shotguns and any other weapon under
the National Firearms Act (26 U.S.C. § 5801 et seq.).
SF0029

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0082

Section 2. This act shall apply to all firearm hold
agreements entered into on or after July 1, 2025.

Section 3. This act is effective July 1, 2025.

(END)
SF0029